New York, session 2025-2026, A927.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (h) to read as follows: 3 (h) Births of infants with congenital heart defects, including treat- 4 ment recommendations, and any other information the commissioner deems 5 appropriate. 6 § 2. Subdivision 1-e of section 2803-j of the public health law, as 7 added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 relating to including information 8 on congenital heart defect births in the informational leaflets required 9 to be given to maternity patients, as proposed in legislative bills 10 numbers S. 9283 and A. 7516-A, is REPEALED. 11 § 3. Section 3 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public 12 health law relating to including information on congenital heart defect 13 births in the informational leaflets required to be given to maternity 14 patients, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9283 and A. 15 7516-A, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 3. This act shall take effect on the [thirtieth] ninetieth day after 17 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02904-01-5 A. 927 2 1 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 2 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 3 completed on or before such effective date. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 5 sections one and two of this act shall take effect on the same date and 6 in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public 7 health law relating to including information on congenital heart defect 8 births in the informational leaflets required to be given to maternity 9 patients, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9283 and A. 10 7516-A, takes effect.